Hawaii statutes.
[§88-27.5] Closed meetings of
the board; authorized. (a) The board may hold a meeting closed to the
public in accordance with the procedures for holding an executive session
meeting pursuant to section 92-4 for the following purposes:

(1) To conduct discussions or deliberations relating
to, or to make a decision upon, investments or prospective investments by the
system that require the consideration of information or records that are exempt
from disclosure under chapter 92F, including without limitation information and
records that are proprietary information or confidential business information;

(2) To conduct discussions and deliberations or to
make decisions relating to procurements that are exempt from chapter 103D to
the same extent that the discussion, deliberation, and decision would be
required to be conducted or made confidentially if the procurement were subject
to chapter 103D; and

(3) To deliberate concerning the authority of persons
designated by the board to negotiate investments or the sale of property held
by or for the benefit of the system, or during the conduct of such
negotiations.

(b) The purposes for which the board may hold
a meeting closed to the public pursuant to this section are in addition to the
purposes described in section 92-5(a) or any other applicable exemption from
part I of chapter 92. [L 2015, c 88, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next